Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,136
Sections; when operative.

Sections 85-1,131 to 85-1,137 shall become operative whenever laws granting a similar stipend or similarly restricting hours of participation are enacted in at least four other states which have teams that compete in the Big Ten Conference or its successor.

Laws 2003, LB 688, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB102, § 2.